New York, session 2025-2026, A10980.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 606 of the tax law is amended by adding a new 2 subsection (bbb) to read as follows: 3 (bbb) School supplies education credit. (1) (A) A resident taxpayer 4 that is a parent, guardian or other person, lawfully having the care, 5 custody or control of a person who has not yet attained the age of nine- 6 teen years, and such person is enrolled in elementary or secondary 7 education in any public school, nonpublic or charter school, board of 8 cooperative educational services, or that receives home instruction, 9 shall be allowed a credit equal to the cost of learning materials and 10 school supplies purchased for education purposes during the taxable 11 year, provided that such credit shall not exceed five hundred dollars 12 per student and shall not exceed the total one thousand five hundred 13 dollars per family. 14 (B) For the purposes of this section the term "learning materials" 15 shall include, but shall not be limited to, textbooks, instructional 16 materials, workbooks, supplemental learning materials, videos, and soft- 17 ware. The term "school supplies" shall include but shall not be limited 18 to, writing utensils, arts and crafts materials, notebooks, folders and 19 binders, electronics such as scientific or graphing calculators, musical 20 instruments rentals and purchase, and other classroom stationary. 21 (2) If the amount of credit allowable under this subsection for any 22 taxable year shall exceed the taxpayer's tax for such year, the excess 23 shall be treated as an overpayment of tax to be credited or refunded in 24 accordance with the provisions of section six hundred eighty-six of this 25 article, provided, however, that no interest shall be paid thereon. 26 (3) In the case of a married couple who file a joint federal return, 27 but who are required to determine their New York taxes separately, the EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15305-01-6 A. 10980 2 1 credit allowed pursuant to this subsection may be applied against the 2 tax imposed of either or divided between them as they may elect. 3 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately and shall apply to taxable 4 years commencing on or after January 1, 2027.